Latvian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

med N3dekl;
led N3dekl;
tirg N3dekl;
seg N4dekl;
lamp N4dekl;
som N4dekl;
krūz N5dekl;
saul N5dekl;
zem N5dekl;
lād N5dekl;
sarakst N5dekl;

LEXICON N3dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^us #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^us #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^um #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ū #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os #;

LEXICON N4dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^a #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^as #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ai #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^as #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ām #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^as #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ās #;

LEXICON N5dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^e #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^Mi #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs #;
